New Jersey, session 222, S1584.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. R.S.39:3-10 is amended to read as follows: 39:3-10.  a. A person shall not drive a motor vehicle on a public highway in this State unless the person is under supervision while participating in a behind-the-wheel driving course pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1977, c.25 (C.39:3-13.2a) or is in possession of a validated permit, or a probationary or basic driver's license issued to that person in accordance with this article. b.    A person under 18 years of age shall not be issued a basic license to drive motor vehicles, and a person shall not be issued a validated permit, including a validated examination permit, until the applicant has passed a satisfactory examination and other requirements as to the applicant's ability as an operator.  The examination shall include:  a test of the applicant's vision; the applicant's ability to understand traffic control devices; the applicant's knowledge of safe driving practices, including the dangers of driving a vehicle in an aggressive manner, which shall include, but not be limited to, unexpectedly altering the speed of a vehicle, making improper or erratic traffic lane changes, disregarding traffic control devices, failing to yield the right of way, and following another vehicle too closely; the applicant's knowledge of operating a motor vehicle in a manner that safely shares the roadway with pedestrians, cyclists, skaters, riders of motorized-scooters, and other non-motorized vehicles, which shall include, but not be limited to, passing a cyclist on the roadway, recognizing bicycle lanes, navigating intersections with pedestrians and cyclists, and exiting a vehicle without endangering pedestrians and cyclists; the applicant's knowledge of the effects that ingestion of alcohol or drugs has on a person's ability to operate a motor vehicle; the applicant's knowledge of the dangers of carbon monoxide poisoning from motor vehicles and techniques for the safe operation and proper maintenance of a motor vehicle; the applicant's knowledge of portions of the mechanism of motor vehicles as is necessary to insure the safe operation of a vehicle of the kind or kinds indicated by the applicant; and the applicant's knowledge of the laws and ordinary usages of the road.  The examination shall be made available in English and each of the three languages, other than English, most commonly spoken in the State, as determined by the chief administrator.  The chief administrator shall periodically, and at least every five years, verify the three languages, other than English, most commonly spoken in the State. c.     A person shall not sit for an examination for any permit without exhibiting photo identification deemed acceptable by the commission, unless that person is a high school student participating in a course of automobile driving education approved by the State Department of Education and conducted in a public, parochial, or private school of this State, pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1950, c.127 (C.39:3-13.1). Prior to taking an examination for any permit, a person shall watch a video created by the commission, in conjunction with the Attorney General, explaining the rights and responsibilities of a driver stopped by a law enforcement officer.  The video shall be used for informational purposes only and shall not be used in any criminal proceeding involving a driver stopped by a law enforcement officer. The commission may waive the written law knowledge examination for any person 18 years of age or older possessing a valid driver's license issued by any other state, the District of Columbia, or the United States Territories of American Samoa, Guam, Northern Mariana Islands, Puerto Rico, or the Virgin Islands.  The commission shall be required to provide that person with a booklet that highlights those motor vehicle laws unique to New Jersey.  A road test shall be required for a probationary license and serve as a demonstration of the applicant's ability to operate a vehicle of the class designated.  During the road test, an applicant may use a rear visibility system, parking sensors, or other technology installed on the motor vehicle that enables the applicant to view areas directly behind the vehicle or alerts the applicant of obstacles while parking. d.    A person shall not sit for a road test unless that person exhibits photo identification deemed acceptable by the commission.  A high school student who has completed a course of behind-the-wheel automobile driving education approved by the State Department of Education and conducted in a public, parochial, or private school of this State, who has been issued a special learner's permit pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1950, c.127 (C.39:3-13.1) prior to January 1, 2003, shall not be required to exhibit photo identification in order to sit for a road test.  The commission may waive the road test for any person 18 years of age or older possessing a valid driver's license issued by any other state, the District of Columbia, or the United States Territories of American Samoa, Guam, Northern Mariana Islands, Puerto Rico, or the Virgin Islands.  The road test shall be given on public streets, where practicable and feasible, but may be preceded by an off-street screening process to assess basic skills.  The commission shall approve locations for the road test which pose no more than a minimal risk of injury to the applicant, the examiner, and other motorists.  New locations for the road test shall not be approved unless the test can be given on public streets.  Notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, a person with a disability shall be permitted to take the required road test with a parent or guardian in the vehicle. e.     A person who successfully completes a road test for a motorcycle license or a motorcycle endorsement when operating a motorcycle or motorized scooter with an engine displacement of less than 231 cubic centimeters shall be issued a motorcycle license or endorsement restricting the person's operation of the vehicles to any motorcycle with an engine displacement of 500 cubic centimeters or less.  A person who successfully completes a road test for a motorcycle license or motorcycle endorsement when operating a motorcycle with an engine displacement of 231 or more cubic centimeters shall be issued a motorcycle license or endorsement without any restriction as to engine displacement.  Any person who successfully completes an approved motorcycle safety education course established pursuant to the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1991, c.452 (C.27:5F-36) shall be issued a motorcycle license or endorsement without restriction as to engine displacement. f.     A person issued a motorcycle license pursuant to this section may be issued a standard motorcycle license or a REAL ID motorcycle license.  The chief administrator shall require an applicant for a standard motorcycle license to provide as proof of the applicant's identity, age, and residence primary and secondary documents, with which the chief administrator shall attribute point values in accordance with the point based identification verification program established pursuant to section 28 of P.L.2003, c.13 (C.39:2A-28).  The point total required to prove the identity of an applicant for the standard motorcycle license shall be the same for every applicant, regardless of immigration status.  In the event that the commission changes the point total threshold, the requirement that every applicant reach the same point total threshold shall remain in effect. In addition to requiring the person to submit satisfactory proof of identity and age, the commission shall require the person to provide: (1)   as a condition for obtaining a standard motorcycle license, proof of the person's social security number and one document providing satisfactory proof that the person is a New Jersey resident. If the person does not have a social security number, the person shall either: (a)   provide satisfactory proof of an Individual Taxpayer Identification Number; or (b)   indicate, in a manner prescribed by the commission and consistent with all other provisions of P.L.2019, c.271 (C.39:3-10o et al.), that the person is not eligible to receive a social security number; or (2)   as a condition for obtaining a REAL ID motorcycle license:  two documents providing satisfactory proof that the person is a New Jersey resident; proof of the person's social security number or verification of ineligibility for a social security number in accordance with the "REAL ID Act of 2005," Pub.L.109-13, any acts amendatory or supplementary thereto, and any federal regulations adopted thereunder; and proof that the person's presence in the United States is authorized under federal law. A standard motorcycle license shall indicate that the license shall not be accepted as identification for an official purpose, as that term is defined under the "REAL ID Act of 2005," Pub.L.109-13, any acts amendatory or supplementary thereto, and any federal regulations adopted thereunder. g.    The commission shall issue a standard basic driver's license or a REAL ID basic driver's license to operate a motor vehicle other than a motorcycle to a person over 18 years of age who previously has not been licensed to drive a motor vehicle in this State or another jurisdiction only if that person has:  (1) operated a passenger automobile in compliance with the requirements of this Title for not less than one year, not including any period of suspension or postponement, from the date of issuance of a probationary license pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1950, c.127 (C.39:3-13.4); (2) not been assessed more than two motor vehicle points; (3) not been convicted in the previous year for a violation of R.S.39:4-50, section 2 of P.L.1981, c.512 (C.39:4-50.4a), section 1 of P.L.1992, c.189 (C.39:4-50.14), R.S.39:4-129, N.J.S.2C:11-5, section 1 of P.L.2017, c.165 (C.2C:11-5.3), subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:12-1, or any other motor vehicle-related violation the commission determines to be significant and applicable pursuant to regulation; and (4) passed an examination of the applicant's ability to operate a motor vehicle pursuant to this section. h.    The commission shall expand the driver's license examination by 20 percent.  The additional questions to be added shall consist solely of questions developed in conjunction with the Department of Health concerning the use of alcohol or drugs as related to highway safety.  The commission shall develop, in conjunction with the Department of Health, supplements to the driver's manual which shall include information necessary to answer any question on the driver's license examination concerning alcohol or drugs as related to highway safety. Up to 20 questions may be added to the examination on subjects to be determined by the commission that are of particular relevance to youthful drivers, including the importance of operating a motor vehicle in a manner that safely shares the roadway with pedestrians, cyclists, skaters, riders of motorized-scooters, and other non-motorized vehicles, which shall include, but not be limited to, passing a cyclist on the roadway, recognizing bicycle lanes, navigating intersections with pedestrians and cyclists, and exiting a vehicle without endangering pedestrians and cyclists, and the dangers of driving a vehicle in an aggressive manner, which shall include, but not be limited to, unexpectedly altering the speed of a vehicle, making improper or erratic traffic lane changes, disregarding traffic control devices, failing to yield the right of way, and following another vehicle too closely, after consultation with the Director of the Division of Highway Traffic Safety in the Department of Law and Public Safety. The commission shall expand the driver's license examination to include a question asking whether the applicant is aware of the provisions of the "Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act," P.L.2008, c.50 (C.26:6-77 et al.) and the procedure for indicating on the driver's license the intention to make a donation of body organs or tissues pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1978, c.181 (C.39:3-12.2). The commission shall expand the driver's license examination to include a question asking whether the applicant is aware of the dangers of failing to comply with this State's motor vehicle traffic laws and the "STOP for Nikhil Safety Pledge" set forth in subsection e. of R.S.39:3-41. The commission shall expand the driver's license examination to include questions concerning the dangers of carbon monoxide poisoning from motor vehicles and techniques for the safe operation and proper maintenance of a motor vehicle. i.     Any person applying for a driver's license to operate a motor vehicle or motorized bicycle in this State shall surrender to the commission any current driver's license issued to the applicant by another state or jurisdiction upon the applicant's receipt of a driver's license for this State.  The commission shall refuse to issue a driver's license if the applicant fails to comply with this provision.  An applicant for a permit or license who is under 18 years of age, and who holds a permit or license for a passenger automobile issued by another state or country that is valid or has expired within a time period designated by the commission, shall be subject to the permit and license requirements and penalties applicable to State permit and license applicants who are of the same age; except that if the other state or country has permit or license standards substantially similar to those of this State, the credentials of the other state or country shall be acceptable. j. (1) The commission shall create classified licensing of drivers covering the following classifications: (a) Motorcycles, except that for the purposes of this section, motorcycle shall not include any three-wheeled motor vehicle equipped with a single cab with glazing enclosing the occupant, seats similar to those of a passenger vehicle or truck, seat belts and automotive steering or any vehicle defined as a motorcycle pursuant to R.S.39:1-1 having a motor with a maximum piston displacement that is less than 50 cubic centimeters or a motor that is rated at no more than 1.5 brake horsepower with a maximum speed of no more than 35 miles per hour on a flat surface. (b) Omnibuses as classified by R.S.39:3-10.1 and school buses classified under N.J.S.18A:39-1 et seq. (c) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1999, c.28) (d) All motor vehicles not included in classifications (a) and (b).  A license issued pursuant to this classification d. shall be referred to as the "basic driver's license" and may be issued as a standard basic driver's license or a REAL ID basic driver's license. (2)   Every applicant for a license under classification b. shall be a holder of a basic driver's license. Any issuance of a license under classification b. shall be by endorsement on the person's basic driver's license. (3)   A driver's license for motorcycles may be issued separately, but if issued to the holder of a basic driver's license, it shall be by endorsement on the person's basic driver's license.  The holder of a basic driver's license or a separately issued motorcycle license shall be authorized to operate a motorcycle having a motor with a maximum piston displacement that is less than 50 cubic centimeters or a motor that is rated at no more than 1.5 brake horsepower with a maximum speed no more than 35 miles per hour on a flat surface. k.    The commission, upon payment of the lawful fee and after it or a person authorized by it has examined the applicant and is satisfied of the applicant's ability as an operator, may, in its discretion, issue a license to the applicant to drive a motor vehicle.  The license shall authorize the person to drive any registered vehicle, of the kind or kinds indicated. l.     The license shall expire, except as otherwise provided, during the fourth calendar year following the date in which the license was issued and on the same calendar day as the person's date of birth.  If the person's date of birth does not correspond to a calendar day of the fourth calendar year, the license shall expire on the last day of the person's birth month. The commission may, at its discretion and for good cause shown, issue licenses that expire on a date fixed by it.  If the commission issues a REAL ID basic driver's license or REAL ID motorcycle license to a person who has demonstrated authorization to be present in the United States for a period of time shorter than the standard period of the license, the commission shall fix the expiration date of the license at a date based on the period in which the person is authorized to be present in the United States under federal immigration laws.  The commission may renew the person's REAL ID basic driver's license or REAL ID motorcycle license only if it is demonstrated that the person's continued presence in the United States is authorized under federal law.  The fee for licenses with expiration dates fixed by the commission shall be fixed by the commission in amounts proportionately less or greater than the fee herein established. m.   The required fee for a license for the license period shall be as follows, subject to adjustment pursuant to section 16 of P.L.2007, c.335 (C.39:2A-36.1): Standard motorcycle license or endorsement:  $18. REAL ID motorcycle license:  $29. Omnibus or school bus endorsement:  $18. Standard basic driver's license:  $18. REAL ID basic driver's license:  $29. The commission shall waive the payment of fees for issuance of omnibus endorsements whenever an applicant establishes to the commission's satisfaction that the applicant will use the omnibus endorsement exclusively for operating omnibuses owned by a nonprofit organization duly incorporated under Title 15 or 16 of the Revised Statutes or Title 15A of the New Jersey Statutes. n.    The commission shall issue licenses for the following license period on and after the first day of the calendar month immediately preceding the commencement of the period, the licenses to be effective immediately. o.    All applications for renewals of licenses shall be made in a manner prescribed by the commission and in accordance with procedures established by it. p.    The commission1,1 in its discretion1,1 may refuse to grant a permit or license to drive motor vehicles to a person who is, in its estimation, not a proper person to be granted a permit or license, but a defect of the applicant shall not debar the applicant from receiving a permit or license unless it can be shown by tests approved by the commission that the defect incapacitates the applicant from safely operating a motor vehicle. q.    A person issued a basic driver's license pursuant to this section may be issued a standard basic driver's license or a REAL ID basic driver's license.  The chief administrator shall require an applicant for a standard basic driver's license to provide as proof of the applicant's identity, age, and residence primary and secondary documents, with which the chief administrator shall attribute point values in accordance with the point based identification verification program established pursuant to section 28 of P.L.2003, c.13 (C.39:2A-28).  The point total required to prove the identity of an applicant for the standard basic driver's license shall be the same for every applicant, regardless of immigration status.  In the event that the commission changes the point total threshold, the requirement that every applicant reach the same point total threshold shall remain in effect. r.     In addition to requiring an applicant for a driver's license to submit satisfactory proof of identity and age, the commission also shall require the applicant to provide: (1)   as a condition for obtaining a permit and standard basic driver's license, proof of the person's social security number and one document providing satisfactory proof that the applicant is a New Jersey resident.  If the person does not have a social security number, the person shall either: (a)   provide satisfactory proof of an Individual Taxpayer Identification Number; or (b)   indicate, in a manner prescribed by the commission and consistent with all other provisions of P.L.2019, c.271 (C.39:3-10o et al.), that the person is not eligible to receive a social security number; or (2)   as a condition for obtaining a REAL ID basic driver's license:  two documents providing satisfactory proof that the applicant is a New Jersey resident; proof of the applicant's social security number or verification of ineligibility for a social security number in accordance with the "REAL ID Act of 2005," Pub.L.109-13, any acts amendatory or supplementary thereto, and any federal regulations adopted thereunder; and proof that the applicant's presence in the United States is authorized under federal law. s.     A standard basic driver's license shall indicate that the license shall not be accepted as identification for an official purpose, as that term is defined under the "REAL ID Act of 2005," Pub.L.109-13, any acts amendatory or supplementary thereto, and any federal regulations adopted thereunder. t.     If the commission has reasonable cause to suspect that any document presented by an applicant pursuant to this section is altered, false, or otherwise invalid, the commission shall refuse to grant the permit or license until the time when the document may be verified by the issuing agency to the commission's satisfaction. u.    A person violating this section shall be subject to a fine not exceeding $500 or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 60 days, but if that person has never been licensed to drive in this State or any other jurisdiction, the applicant shall be subject to a fine of not less than $200 and, in addition, the court shall issue an order to the commission requiring the commission to refuse to issue a license to operate a motor vehicle to the person for a period of not less than 180 days.  The penalties provided for by this paragraph shall not be applicable in cases where failure to have actual possession of the operator's license is due to an administrative or technical error by the commission. v.    Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter or extend the expiration of any license issued prior to the date this amendatory and supplementary act becomes operative. w.   Any documents and personal information, including an applicant's photograph, obtained by the commission from an applicant for a standard basic driver's license or standard motorcycle license shall be confidential, shall not be considered a government record pursuant to P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.), P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5 et al.), or the common law concerning access to government records, and shall not be disclosed by the commission for any purpose related to Title 8 of the United States Code without the informed consent of the applicant, a warrant signed by a State or federal judge, or a lawful court order or subpoena; except that nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit, or in any way restrict, any action where such prohibition or restriction would be contrary to federal law; and except that information under this subsection may be shared in accordance with section 2 of P.L.2021, c.139 (C.39:2-3.9). When responding to a warrant, court order, or subpoena, the commission may disclose only those records or information specifically requested in the warrant, court order, or subpoena. Possession of a standard basic driver's license or standard motorcycle license issued pursuant to this section shall not be considered evidence of an individual's citizenship or immigration status and shall not be used as a basis for an investigation, arrest, citation, prosecution, or detention. Information regarding an applicant's Individual [Tax] Taxpayer Identification Number, social security number, or ineligibility to receive a social security number obtained by the commission for the issuance of a standard motorcycle license or standard basic driver's license pursuant to this section, shall not be considered a government record pursuant to P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.), P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5 et al.), or the common law concerning access to government records, and shall not be disclosed by the commission except where:  (1) required by section 11 of P.L.1998, c.1 (C.2A:17-56.60); (2) the applicant provides written informed consent to the disclosure; (3) the requesting entity presents a warrant signed by a State or federal judge, a lawful court order, or a subpoena; (4) required by State or federal law, and to the extent that the disclosure may be necessary to permit the State to participate in the National Driver Register program, as set forth in 49 U.S.C. s.30301 et seq.; (5) the disclosure is in connection with an audit or investigation of identity fraud, driver's license fraud, or non-driver identification card fraud; or (6) consistent with section 2 of P.L.2021, c.139 (C.39:2-3.9). x.    As used in this section: "Parking sensors" means proximity sensors which use either electromagnetic or ultrasonic technology and are designed to alert the driver to obstacles while parking. Person with a disability means a person who has a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities or a person who has a history or record of such an impairment, as determined by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission. "Rear visibility system" means devices or components installed on a motor vehicle at the time of manufacture that allow a forward facing driver to view a visual image of the area directly behind the vehicle. (cf: P.L.2021, c.139, s.4) 2.  R.S.39:3-13 is amended to read as follows: 39:3-13. a. The chief administrator may, in the chief administrator's discretion, issue to a person over 17 years of age an examination permit, under the hand and seal of the chief administrator, allowing that person, for the purpose of fitting the person to become a licensed driver, to operate a designated class of motor vehicles other than passenger automobiles and motorcycles for a specified period of not more than 90 days, while in the company and under the supervision of a driver licensed to operate the designated class of motor vehicles. b.    The chief administrator, in the chief administrator's discretion, may issue for a specified period of not less than one year a passenger automobile or motorcycle-only examination permit to a person over 17 years of age regardless of whether a person has completed a course of behind-the-wheel automobile driving education pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1950, c.127 (C.39:3-13.1); except that a person with a disability who is 16 years of age shall be permitted to obtain a passenger automobile examination permit regardless of whether the person has completed a course of behind-the-wheel automobile driving education pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1950, c.127 (C.39:3-13.1). An examination permit applicant who is under 18 years of age shall obtain the signature of a parent or guardian for submission to the commission on a form prescribed by the chief administrator.  The chief administrator shall postpone for six months the driving privileges of any person who submits a fraudulent signature for a parent or guardian.  As used in this subsection, person with a disability means a person who has a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities or a person who has a history or record of such an impairment, as determined by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission. c.     For six months immediately following the validation of an examination permit, and until the holder passes the road test, the holder who is less than 21 years of age shall operate the passenger automobile only when accompanied by, and under the supervision of, a New Jersey licensed driver who is at least 21 years of age and has been licensed to drive a passenger automobile for not less than three years.  The holder of an examination permit who is at least 21 years of age shall operate the passenger automobile for the first three months under this supervision and until the holder passes the road test.  The supervising driver of the passenger automobile shall sit in the front seat of the vehicle. Whenever operating a vehicle while in possession of an examination permit, the holder of the permit shall operate the passenger automobile with only one additional passenger in the vehicle excluding dependents of the permit holder, except that this passenger restriction shall not apply when the permit holder is at least 21 years of age or when the permit holder is accompanied by a parent or guardian.  Further, the holder of the passenger automobile permit who is less than 21 years of age shall not drive during the hours between 11:01 p.m. and 5:00 a.m.; provided, however, that this condition may be waived for an emergency which, in the judgment of local police, is of sufficient severity and magnitude to substantially endanger the health, safety, welfare, or property of a person, or for any bona fide employment or religion-related activity if the employer or appropriate religious authority provides written verification of the activity in a manner provided for by the chief administrator.  The holder of the examination permit shall not use any hand-held or hands-free interactive wireless communication device, except in an emergency, while operating a moving passenger automobile on a public road or highway.  "Use" shall include, but not be limited to, talking or listening on any hand-held or hands-free interactive wireless communication device or operating its keys, buttons, or other controls.  The passenger automobile permit holder shall ensure that all occupants of the vehicle are secured in a properly adjusted and fastened seat belt or child restraint system. d.    The holder of an examination permit subject to the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1977, c.23 (C.39:3-10b) shall not operate a motorcycle at any time from a half-hour after sunset to a half-hour before sunrise.  A motorcycle operated by the holder of an examination permit shall carry only the operator and shall not be operated on any toll road over which the New Jersey Turnpike Authority or the South Jersey Transportation Authority has jurisdiction or on any limited-access interstate highway. e.     The holder of any examination permit shall not operate a motorcycle having a motor with a maximum piston displacement that is less than 50 cubic centimeters or a motor that is rated at no more than 1.5 brake horsepower with a maximum speed of no more than 35 miles per hour on a flat surface at any time from a half-hour after sunset to a half-hour before sunrise and shall not operate the motorcycle with any other passenger.  The holder of any examination permit shall not operate such a motorcycle upon limited-access interstate highways or public roads or highways with a posted speed limit greater than 35 miles per hour. f.     An applicant for an examination permit subject to the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1977, c.23 (C.39:3-10b), who is less than 18 years of age, shall be required to successfully complete a motorcycle safety education course established pursuant to the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1991, c.452 (C.27:5F-36) as a condition for obtaining a motorcycle license or endorsement. g.    The chief administrator shall provide the holder of an examination permit with two removable, transferable, highly visible, reflective decals indicating that the driver of the vehicle may be the holder of an examination permit.  The decals shall be designed by the chief administrator, in consultation with the Division of Highway Traffic Safety in the Department of Law and Public Safety.  The chief administrator may charge a fee for the decals not to exceed the actual cost of producing and distributing the decals.  The decals shall be displayed in a manner prescribed by the chief administrator, in consultation with the Division of Highway Traffic Safety in the Department of Law and Public Safety, and shall be clearly visible to law enforcement officers.  The holder of an examination permit shall not operate a vehicle unless the decals are displayed.  The decal shall be removed once the driver's examination permit period has ended. h.    When notified by a court of competent jurisdiction that an examination permit holder has been convicted of a violation which causes the permit holder to accumulate more than two motor vehicle points or has been convicted of a violation of:  R.S.39:4-50; section 2 of P.L.1981, c.512 (C.39:4-50.4a); section 1 of P.L.1992, c.189 (C.39:4-50.14); R.S.39:4-129; N.J.S.2C:11-5; section 1 of P.L.2017, c.165 (C.2C:11-5.3); subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:12-1; or any other motor vehicle-related law the chief administrator deems significant and applicable pursuant to regulation, in addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, the chief administrator shall, without the exercise of discretion or a hearing, suspend the examination permit holder's examination permit for 90 days.  The chief administrator shall restore the permit following the term of the permit suspension if the permit holder satisfactorily completes a remedial training course of not less than four hours which may be given by the commission, a driving school licensed by the chief administrator pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1951, c.216 (C.39:12-2), or any Statewide safety organization approved by the chief administrator.  The course shall be subject to oversight by the commission according to its guidelines.  The permit holder shall also remit a course fee prior to the commencement of the course.  The chief administrator also shall postpone without the exercise of discretion or a hearing the issuance of a basic license for 90 days if the chief administrator is notified by a court of competent jurisdiction that the examination permit holder, after completion of the remedial training course, has been convicted of any motor vehicle violation which results in the imposition of any motor vehicle points or has been convicted of a violation of:  R.S.39:4-50; section 2 of P.L.1981, c.512 (C.39:4-50.4a); section 1 of P.L.1992, c.189 (C.39:4-50.14); R.S.39:4-129; N.J.S.2C:11-5; subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:12-1; or any other motor vehicle-related law the chief administrator deems significant and applicable pursuant to regulation. When the chief administrator is notified by a court of competent jurisdiction that an examination permit holder has been convicted of any alcohol or drug-related offense unrelated to the operation of a motor vehicle and is not otherwise subject to any other suspension penalty therefor, the chief administrator shall, without the exercise of discretion or a hearing, suspend the examination permit for six months. i.     An examination permit for a motorcycle or a commercial motor vehicle issued to a person with a disability, as determined by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission after consultation with the Department of Education, shall be valid for nine months or until the completion of the road test portion of the license examination, whichever period is shorter. j.     Each permit shall be sufficient license for the person to operate the designated class of motor vehicles in this State during the period specified, while in the company of and under the control of a driver licensed by this State to operate the designated class of motor vehicles, or, in the case of a commercial driver license permit, while in the company of and under the control of a holder of a valid commercial driver license for the appropriate license class and with the appropriate endorsements issued by this or any other state.  The person, as well as the licensed driver, except for a motor vehicle examiner administering a driving skills test, shall be held accountable for all violations of this subtitle committed by the person while in the presence of the licensed driver. k.    In addition to requiring an applicant for an examination permit to submit satisfactory proof of identity and age in accordance with the type of license for which the applicant has applied, the chief administrator also shall require the applicant to provide the requisite number of documents providing satisfactory proof that the applicant is a resident of the State in accordance with the provisions of R.S.39:3-10. l.     Any documents and personal information, including an applicant's photograph, obtained by the commission from an applicant for a standard permit shall be confidential, shall not be considered a government record pursuant to P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.), P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5 et al.), or the common law concerning access to government records, and shall not be disclosed by the commission for any purposes related to Title 8 of the United States Code without the informed consent of the applicant, a warrant signed by a State or federal judge, or a lawful court order or subpoena; except that nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit, or in any way restrict, any action where such prohibition or restriction would be contrary to federal law; and except that information under this subsection may be shared in accordance with section 2 of P.L.2021, c.139 (C.39:2-3.9).  When responding to a warrant, court order, or subpoena, the commission may disclose only those records or information specifically requested in the warrant, court order, or subpoena. Possession of a standard permit issued pursuant to this section shall not be considered evidence of an individual's citizenship or immigration status and shall not be used as a basis for an investigation, arrest, citation, prosecution, or detention. Information regarding an applicant's Individual Taxpayer Identification Number, social security number, or ineligibility to receive a social security number obtained by the commission for the issuance of a standard permit pursuant to this section, shall not be considered a government record pursuant to P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.), P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5 et al.), or the common law concerning access to government records, and shall not be disclosed by the commission except where: (1) required by section 11 of P.L.1998, c.1 (C.2A:17-56.60); (2) the applicant provides written informed consent to the disclosure; (3) the requesting entity presents a warrant signed by a State or federal judge, a lawful court order, or a subpoena; (4) required by State or federal law, and to the extent that the disclosure may be necessary to permit the State to participate in the National Driver Register program, as set forth in 49 U.S.C. s.30301 et seq.; (5) the disclosure is in connection with an audit or investigation of identity fraud, driver's license fraud, or non-driver identification card fraud; or (6) consistent with section 2 of P.L.2021, c.139 (C.39:2-3.9). m.   If the chief administrator has reasonable cause to suspect that any document presented by an applicant pursuant to this section is altered, false, or otherwise invalid, the chief administrator shall refuse to grant the permit until the document is verified by the issuing agency to the chief administrator's satisfaction. n.    A person violating this section shall be subject to a fine not exceeding $500 or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 60 days, but if that person has never been licensed to drive in this State or any other jurisdiction, the applicant shall be subject to a fine of not less than $200 and, in addition, the court shall issue an order to the commission requiring the commission to refuse to issue a license to operate a motor vehicle to the person for a period of not less than 180 days. o.    A probationary driver's license shall not be issued to the holder of an examination permit under the age of 21 unless the permit holder completes a minimum of 50 hours of practice driving, 10 hours of which shall be completed during hours of darkness.  The permit holder's parent or guardian, or the person who accompanied and supervised the permit holder during the practice driving, shall certify, in a form and manner determined by the chief administrator, that the permit holder has completed the required number of hours of practice driving, including the required number of hours during hours of darkness.  The chief administrator shall suspend for six months the driving privileges of any examination permit holder who submits a fraudulent certification of a parent, guardian, or supervising driver. The holder of an examination permit shall be required to take a road test in order to obtain a probationary license.  No road test for any person who has been issued an examination permit to operate a passenger vehicle shall be given unless the person has met the requirements of this section.  No road test for a probationary license shall be given unless the applicant has first secured an examination permit and no road test shall be scheduled for an applicant who has secured an examination permit for a passenger vehicle or a motorcycle for which an endorsement is not required until at least six months, for an applicant under 21 years of age, or three months, for an applicant 21 years of age or older, have elapsed following the validation of the examination permit for practice driving, or, in the case of an examination permit for other vehicles, until 20 days have elapsed.  In the case of an omnibus endorsement or school bus, no road test shall be scheduled until at least 10 days shall have elapsed.  Every applicant for an examination permit to qualify for an omnibus endorsement or an articulated vehicle endorsement shall be a holder of a valid basic driver's license. p.    The required fees for special learner's permits and examination permits shall be as follows: Basic driver's license...............................................up to $10 Motorcycle license or endorsement...................................$5 Omnibus or school bus endorsement................................$25 q.    The chief administrator shall waive the payment of fees for issuance of examination permits for omnibus endorsements whenever the applicant establishes to the chief administrator's satisfaction that the applicant will use the omnibus endorsement exclusively for operating omnibuses owned by a nonprofit organization duly incorporated under Title 15 or 16 of the Revised Statutes or Title 15A of the New Jersey Statutes. r.     The specified period for which a permit is issued may be extended for not more than an additional 60 days, without payment of an added fee, upon application made by the holder thereof, where the holder has applied to take the examination for a driver's license prior to the expiration of the original period for which the permit was issued and the chief administrator was unable to schedule an examination during the period. s.     As a condition for the issuance of an examination permit under this section, the chief administrator shall secure a digitized photograph of the applicant.  The photograph shall be stored in a manner prescribed by the chief administrator and may be displayed on the examination permit. The chief administrator may require that whenever a person to whom an examination permit has been issued has reconstructive or cosmetic surgery which significantly alters the person's facial features, the person shall notify the chief administrator who may require the photograph of the person to be updated. t.     Specific use of the examination permit and any information stored or encoded, electronically or otherwise, in relation thereto shall be in accordance with P.L.1997, c.188 (C.39:2-3.3 et seq.), section 2 of P.L.2021, c.139 (C.39:2-3.9), and the federal "Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994," Pub.L.103-322. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the digitized photograph or any access thereto or any use thereof shall not be sold, leased, or exchanged for value. (cf: P.L.2023, c.216, s.1) 3. Section 1 of P.L.1950, c.127 (C.39:3-13.1) is amended to read as follows: 1. a. The Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission may issue to a person over 16 years of age a special learner's permit, under the hand and seal of the chief administrator, allowing such person, for the purpose of preparing to qualify for a probationary license for a passenger automobile by operating a [dual pedal controlled] motor vehicle while taking a required course of behind-the-wheel automobile driving education approved by the State Department of Education and conducted in a public, parochial, or private school of this State or a course of behind-the-wheel automobile driving instruction conducted by a drivers' school duly licensed pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1951, c.216 (C.39:12-1 et seq.). The special learner's permit shall be issued in lieu of the examination permit provided for in R.S.39:3-13. b.    In addition to requiring an applicant for a permit to submit satisfactory proof of identity and age in accordance with the type of license for which the applicant has applied, the chief administrator also shall require the applicant to provide the requisite number of documents providing satisfactory proof that the applicant is a resident of the State. Any documents and personal information, including an applicant's photograph, obtained by the commission from an applicant for a standard permit shall be confidential, shall not be considered a government record pursuant to P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.), P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5 et al.), or the common law concerning access to government records, and shall not be disclosed by the commission for any purpose related to Title 8 of the United States Code without the informed consent of the applicant, a warrant signed by a State or federal judge, or a lawful court order or subpoena; except that nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit, or in any way restrict, any action where such prohibition or restriction would be contrary to federal law; and except that information under this subsection may be shared in accordance with section 2 of P.L.2021, c.139 (C.39:2-3.9).  When responding to a warrant, court order, or subpoena, the commission may disclose only those records or information specifically requested in the warrant, court order, or subpoena. Possession of a standard permit issued pursuant to this section shall not be considered evidence of an individual's citizenship or immigration status and shall not be used as a basis for an investigation, arrest, citation, prosecution, or detention. Information regarding an applicant's Individual [Tax] Taxpayer Identification Number, social security number, or ineligibility to receive a social security number obtained by the commission for the issuance of a standard permit pursuant to this section, shall not be considered a government record pursuant to P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.), P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5 et al.), or the common law concerning access to government records, and shall not be disclosed by the commission except where:  (1) required by section 11 of P.L.1998, c.1 (C.2A:17-56.60); (2) the applicant provides written informed consent to the disclosure; (3) the requesting entity presents a warrant signed by a State or federal judge, a lawful court order, or a subpoena; (4) required by State or federal law, and to the extent that the disclosure may be necessary to permit the State to participate in the National Driver Register program, as set forth in 49 U.S.C. s.30301 et seq.; (5) the disclosure is in connection with an audit or investigation of identity fraud, driver's license fraud, or non-driver identification card fraud; or (6) consistent with section 2 of P.L.2021, c.139 (C.39:2-3.9). If the chief administrator has reasonable cause to suspect that any document presented by an applicant pursuant to this section is altered, false1,1 or otherwise invalid, the chief administrator shall refuse to grant the permit until such time as the document may be verified by the issuing agency to the chief administrator's satisfaction. A person violating this section shall be subject to a fine not exceeding $500 or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 60 days, but if that person has never been licensed to drive in this State or any other jurisdiction, the applicant shall be subject to a fine of not less than $200 and, in addition, the court shall issue an order to the commission requiring the commission to refuse to issue a license to operate a motor vehicle to the person for a period of not less than 180 days. c.     The special learner's permit described above, when issued to a person taking a course of behind-the-wheel driving education conducted in a public, parochial, or private school, shall be retained in the office of the school principal at all times except during such time as the person to whom the permit is issued is undergoing behind-the-wheel automobile driving instruction.  The chief administrator may make such rules and regulations as he may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. (cf: P.L.2021, c.139, s.6) 4. Section 2 of P.L.1950, c.127 (C.39:3-13.2) is amended to read as follows: As used in this section, person with a disability means a person who has a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities or a person who has a history or record of such an impairment, as determined by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission. The special permit shall be sufficient license for the person to operate a [dual pedal controlled] motor vehicle in this State during the period specified, while in the company of and under the control of:  a teacher, certified by the State Department of Education as authorized to instruct in an approved behind-the-wheel automobile driving education course or a duly licensed instructor of a drivers' school[,] or while in the company of a representative of  the [Division of Motor Vehicles] New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission for the purpose of submitting to examination for a driver's license.  Such person, as well as the said teacher or instructor, shall be held accountable for all violations of subtitle 1 of Title 39 of the Revised Statutes and any supplements thereto committed by such person while in the presence of the teacher or instructor. (cf: P.L.1977, c.25, s.5) 5. This act shall take effect immediately.